vi: Điều kiện tuyết phù hợp: Tuyết lạnh/khô; Tuyết bẩn/nhân tạo; Tuyết xốp mới; Tuyết đóng băng; Đa dụng/hỗn hợp; Tuyết ướt; Khác
fr: Compatibilité avec les conditions de neige: Neige froide/sèche; Neige sale/artificielle; Poudreuse fraîche; Neige glacée; Universelle/mixte; Neige mouillée; Autre
pl: Odpowiednie warunki śniegowe: Zimny/suchy śnieg; Brudny/sztuczny śnieg; Świeży puch; Oblodzony śnieg; Uniwersalne/mieszane; Mokry śnieg; Inne
nl: Sneeuwconditie geschiktheid: Koude/droge sneeuw; Vuile/kunstmatige sneeuw; Verse poedersneeuw; IJzige sneeuw; Universeel/gemengd; Natte sneeuw; Anders
ja: 雪質状態適性: 寒冷 / ドライスノー; 汚れ雪 / 人工雪; フレッシュパウダー; 氷雪; 全天候 / ミックス; 湿雪; その他
tr: Kar koşulu uygunluğu: Soğuk/kuru kar; Kirli/suni kar; Taze pudra kar; Buzlu kar; Evrensel/karma; Islak kar; Diğer
zh-TW: 雪況適用性: 乾冷雪; 髒雪/人造雪; 鬆軟新雪; 冰雪/硬雪; 通用/混合雪況; 濕雪; 其他
fi: Soveltuvuus lumiolosuhteisiin: Kylmä/kuiva lumi; Likainen/tekolumi; Puuteri; Jäinen lumi; Yleinen/sekalainen; Märkä lumi; Muu
da: Egnethed til sneforhold: Kold/tør sne; Beskidt/kunstig sne; Frisk puddersne; Isfyldt sne; Universel/blandet; Våd sne; Andet
es: Adecuación según el nivel de nieve: Nieve fría o seca; Nieve sucia o artificial; Nieve polvo fresca; Nieve helada; Universal o mixta; Nieve húmeda; Otro
hr-HR: Prikladnost snježnih uvjeta: Hladan/suh snijeg; Prljav/umjetan snijeg; Svježi pršić; Ledeni snijeg; Univerzalno/miješano; Mokar snijeg; Ostalo
sk-SK: Vhodné do snehových podmienok: Studený/suchý sneh; Špinavý/umelý sneh; Čerstvý prašan; Zľadovatený sneh; Univerzálny/zmiešaný; Mokrý sneh; Iné
ru: Пригодность для состояния снега: Холодный/сухой снег; Грязный/искусственный снег; Свежевыпавший снег; Обледенелый снег; Универсальный/смешанный; Мокрый снег; Другое
sv: Lämplighet för snöförhållanden: Kall/torr snö; Smutsig/konstgjord snö; Färskt puder; Isig snö; Universell/blandad; Våt snö; Övrigt
hu: Hóviszonyokhoz való alkalmasság: Hideg/száraz hó; Szennyezett/műhó; Friss porhó; Jeges hó; Univerzális/vegyes; Nedves hó; Egyéb
nb: Egnethet for snøvilkår: Kald/tørr snø; Skitten/kunstig snø; Puddersnø; Isete snø; Universell/blandet; Våt snø; Annet
th: ความเหมาะสมของสภาพหิมะ: หิมะเย็น/แห้ง; หิมะสกปรก/เทียม; หิมะพาวเดอร์ใหม่; หิมะเป็นน้ำแข็ง; ทั่วไป/ผสม; หิมะเปียก; อื่นๆ
cs: Vhodnost pro sněhové podmínky: Studený/suchý sníh; Špinavý/technický sníh; Čerstvý prašan; Zmrzlý sníh; Univerzální/smíšený; Mokrý sníh; Jiné
bg-BG: Пригодност за снежни условия: Студен/сух сняг; Мръсен/изкуствен сняг; Прясна пудра; Заледен сняг; Универсален/смесен; Мокър сняг; Друго
zh-CN: 雪地条件适用性: 冷/干雪; 脏/人造雪; 新鲜粉雪; 冰状雪; 通用/混合雪质; 湿雪; 其他
el: Καταλληλότητα συνθηκών χιονιού: Κρύο/ξηρό χιόνι; Βρώμικο/τεχνητό χιόνι; Φρέσκο/πούδρα χιόνι; Παγωμένο χιόνι; Γενικής χρήσης/μεικτό; Υγρό χιόνι; Άλλο
ro-RO: Potrivire pentru condițiile de zăpadă: Zăpadă rece/uscată; Zăpadă murdară/artificială; Zăpadă proaspătă; Zăpadă înghețată; Universală/mixtă; Zăpadă umedă; Altele
sl-SI: Primernost glede na snežne razmere: Mrzel/suh sneg; Umazan/umetni sneg; Svež pršič; Poledenel sneg; Univerzalno/mešano; Moker sneg; Drugo
de: Eignung für Schneeverhältnisse: Kalter/trockener Schnee; Schmutziger/künstlicher Schnee; Neuschnee; Eisiger Schnee; Universal/Gemischt; Nasser Schnee; Andere
en: Snow condition suitability: Cold/dry snow; Dirty/artificial snow; Fresh powder; Icy snow; Universal/mixed; Wet snow; Other
it: Idoneità in base alle condizioni della neve: Neve fredda/secca; Neve sporca/artificiale; Neve fresca; Neve ghiacciata; Universale/mista; Neve bagnata; Altro
pt-BR: Neve condição adequação: Neve fria/seca; Neve suja/artificial; Neve fresca; Neve congelada; Universal/mista; Neve úmida; Outra
ko: 눈 상태 적합성: 춥고 건조한 눈; 더럽고 인공적인 눈; 프레시 파우더; 얼음 눈; 유니버설/혼합; 젖은 눈; 기타
lt-LT: Tinkamumas sniego sąlygoms: Šaltas / sausas sniegas; Nešvarus / dirbtinis sniegas; Šviežias purus sniegas; Apledėjęs sniegas; Universalus / mišrus; Šlapias sniegas; Kita
pt-PT: Adequação às condições da neve: Neve fria/seca; Neve suja/artificial; Neve fresca; Neve gelada; Universal/mista; Neve húmida; Outra